Utah statutes.
67-19a-201.   Career Service Review Board created -- Members -- Appointment
-- Removal -- Terms -- Organization -- Per diem and expenses.
(1)  There is created a Career Service Review Board.
(2) (a)  The governor shall appoint five members to the board no more than
three of which are members of the same political party.
(b)  The governor shall appoint members whose gender and ethnicity represent
the career service work force.
(3) (a)  The governor may remove any board member for cause.
(b)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement
shall be appointed for the unexpired term.
(4)  The governor shall ensure that appointees to the board:
(a)  are qualified by knowledge of employee relations and merit system
principles in public employment; and
(b)  are not:
(i)  members of any local, state, or national committee of a political party;
(ii)  officers or members of a committee in any partisan political club; and
(iii)  holding or a candidate for a paid public office.
(5) (a)  Except as required by Subsection (b), the governor shall appoint
board members to serve four-year terms beginning January 1.
(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (a), the governor shall,
at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms to
ensure that the terms of board members are staggered so that approximately
half of the board is appointed every two years.
(c)  The members of the board shall serve until their successors are appointed
and qualified.
(6)  Each year, the board shall choose a chair and vice chair from its own
members.
(7) (a)  Three members of the board are a quorum for the transaction of
business.
(b)  Action by a majority of members when a quorum is present is action of the
board.
(8) (a)  Members shall receive no compensation or benefits for their services,
but may receive per diem and expenses incurred in the performance of the
member’s official duties at the rates established by the Division of Finance
under Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.
(b)  Members may decline to receive per diem and expenses for their service.
